Arkansas, session 2025, SB413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-617 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-617. Oath. [Effective May 1, 2024.]
(a)(1)(A) Each director shall, within ten (10) days after receiving
notice from the county clerk or his or her designee of his or her election or
within ten (10) days after receiving notice from the county clerk or his or
her designee of his or her appointment, subscribe to the following oath
before an individual authorized to administer oaths under § 21-2-105:
“I, _____________, do hereby solemnly swear or affirm, that I
will support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution,
and that I will not be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract
made by the district of which I am a director, except as permitted by state
law, that I shall abide by the ethical guidelines and prohibitions under § 6-
24-101 et seq., and that I will faithfully discharge the duties as school
*SSS148*
03/10/2025 11:19:33 AM SSS148

SB413
director in _____________ School District upon which I am about to enter.
_____________
Director's Signature
_____________
Administrator's Signature
_____________
Date.
_____________ Accepted
_____________ Rejected
_____________ Reason for rejection
_____________
County Clerk's Signature”.
(B) The notification from the county clerk or his or her
designee shall indicate the date by which the oath shall be subscribed to
that the oath shall be subscribed to within ten (10) days after receiving
notice from the county clerk or his or her designee of the director's
election or appointment.
(2)(A) After the oath is administered, the director shall submit
a certification of the administration of the oath to the county clerk or his
or her designee.
(B) The certification of the administration of the oath
shall contain:
(i) A copy of the oath;
(ii) The director's signature;
(iii) The administrator's signature; and
(iv) The date.
(C) The certification of the administration of the oath
shall be submitted to the county clerk or his or her designee no later than
the close of business on the date indicated in the notification from the
county clerk under subdivision (a)(1) of this section ten (10) days after
receiving notice from the county clerk or his or her designee of the
director's election or appointment.
(b)(1) The county clerk or his or her designee, upon receipt of the
certification of the administration of the oath prescribed for a director,
shall immediately: commission the director, and the director shall
immediately assume his or her duties as a director.
03/10/2025 11:19:33 AM SSS148

SB413
(A) Verify that the:
(i) Certification of the administration of the oath
was submitted on or before the close of business on the date indicated in the
notification from the county clerk or his or her designee under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section; and
(ii) Individual before whom the oath was subscribed
to is an individual authorized to administer oaths under § 21-2-105; and
(B) Either:
(i) Accept the certification of the administration
of the oath if it complies with the requirements of this section; or
(ii) Reject the certification of the administration
of the oath if it does not comply with one (1) or more of the requirements of
this section.
(2)(A) Immediately following the acceptance of the certification
of the administration of the oath, the county clerk or his or her designee
shall:
(i) Commission the director;
(ii) Provide the director a copy of § 6-24-101 et
seq.; and
(iii) Require the director to sign an
acknowledgement that he or she received a copy of § 6-24-101 et seq.
(B) The term of the director shall begin upon the
receiving of the commission under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) of this section.
(3) (2) By the close of business of the day following the
receipt of the certification of the administration of the oath, the county
clerk or his or her designee shall either:
(A)(i) Notify the superintendent of the school district by
phone that the individual has subscribed to the director's oath and that the
county clerk has accepted the certification of the administration of the
oath; and
(ii)(B) Send a copy of the certificate of the
administration of the oath to the school district's central office within
five (5) days; or
(B) If the certification of the administration of the oath
has not been timely received or otherwise rejected by the county clerk or his
or her designee, notify the superintendent of the school district by phone of
03/10/2025 11:19:33 AM SSS148

SB413
the rejection of the certification of the administration of the oath by the
close of business on the day following the date indicated in the notification
from the county clerk or his or her designee under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section.
(c) The failure of an elected director to have the oath administered
and submit proof that the oath was administered as required under subsection
(a) of this section will result in:
(1) The individual's not being qualified to serve for the
purpose of Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 5; and
(2) A holdover.


























03/10/2025 11:19:33 AM SSS148